Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB661.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 15102(h)(10) of Title 16 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes, added May 8, 2024 (P.L.50, No.14), is amended to read:§ 15102. Contract procedures, terms and bonds and advertising for bids.* * *(h) Exceptions.--Contracts or purchases made by the county commissioners for the following may not require advertising, bidding or price quotations:* * *(10) The purchase of milk [for counties of the second class A].* * *123456789101112131415161718 Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0661PN0669 - 2 - 1